Iowa, session 2025-2026, HSB621.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 5 TLSB 5344YC (12) 91 ak/ko H.F. _____ Section 1. Section 235.2, Code 2026, is amended by adding 1 the following new subsection: 2 NEW SUBSECTION . 9. Upon implementation by the department 3 of a uniform cost report for shelter care and qualified 4 residential treatment providers, the department shall 5 biennially conduct a review of shelter care and qualified 6 residential treatment provider costs compared to current 7 shelter care and qualified residential treatment provider 8 rates. On or before October 1 of the calendar year immediately 9 succeeding the calendar year in which the review is conducted, 10 the department shall submit a report to the governor and the 11 general assembly detailing the results of the departmentâs 12 review and recommendations for rate adjustments. 13 Sec. 2. Section 249A.4, Code 2026, is amended by adding the 14 following new subsection: 15 NEW SUBSECTION . 15. a. Conduct an annual review of 16 provider reimbursement rates for all medical and health 17 services provided pursuant to this chapter. The department 18 shall compare each provider reimbursement rate to the 19 reimbursement rates for all of the following: 20 (1) Medicaid programs in states contiguous to Iowa. 21 (2) Medicaid programs in states with populations comparable 22 to Iowa as based on the most recent decennial census released 23 by the United States census bureau. 24 (3) The federal Medicare program, if applicable. 25 b. The department shall submit an annual report that 26 summarizes the departmentâs review under paragraph âaâ to the 27 general assembly on or before December 1. 28 Sec. 3. NEW SECTION . 249A.32C Home and community-based 29 service waivers ââ provider rate limits. 30 1. For purposes of this section: 31 a. âConsumerâ means the same as defined in section 249A.29. 32 b. âProviderâ means the same as defined in section 249A.29. 33 c. âWaiverâ means the same as defined in section 249A.29. 34 2. a. Beginning July 1, 2026, the department, with input 35 -1- LSB 5344YC (12) 91 ak/ko 1/ 3 H.F. _____ from the public, providers, and other stakeholders, shall 1 conduct a review at least biennially of provider reimbursement 2 rates for all services rendered under a waiver during the 3 period of review specified by the department. The review shall 4 include but is not limited to all of the following: 5 (1) Aggregate cost to the state to reimburse providers for 6 services rendered to consumers under a waiver. 7 (2) Utilization of services available to consumers. 8 (3) The demonstrated capacity of providers to meet consumer 9 demand for services with available resources and indicators of 10 need for increased resources. 11 b. Based upon the review pursuant to paragraph âaâ , the 12 department shall develop proposed rate models and related 13 changes to departmental policy and procedures. The department 14 shall submit a report to the general assembly on or before 15 December 31 of the year in which the review is completed 16 and must include proposed rate models, the projected fiscal 17 impact of implementing the proposed rate models including 18 documentation supporting the actuarial soundness of the 19 proposed rate models, and the proposed changes to the 20 departmentâs policies and procedures. 21